Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF445.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1837YH (8) 91 jda/jh H.F. 445 Section 1. Section 257.11B, subsections 3 and 4, Code 2025, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 3. a. (1) On or after January 1, but on or before June 3 30, preceding the school year for which the education savings 4 account payment is requested, the parent or guardian of an 5 eligible pupil may request an education savings account payment 6 by submitting an application to the department of education. 7 (2) On or after December 1, but on or before December 20, 8 preceding the semester for which the education savings account 9 payment is requested, the parent or guardian of an eligible 10 pupil may request an education savings account payment by 11 submitting an application to the department of education. 12 b. Within thirty days following submission of an 13 application, the department of education or third-party entity 14 shall notify the parent or guardian of each pupil approved for 15 the following school year or semester and specify the amount of 16 the education savings account payment for the pupil, if known 17 at the time of the notice. As soon as practical following the 18 processing of all applications, the department of education or 19 third-party entity shall determine the number of pupils in each 20 school district approved for the school budget year and provide 21 such information to the department of management. 22 c. Education savings account payments shall only be 23 approved for one school year or one semester, as applicable, 24 and applications must be submitted annually for payments in 25 subsequent school years. 26 4. Each education savings account payment shall be equal to 27 the regular program state cost per pupil for the same school 28 budget year ; provided, however, that an education savings 29 account payment shall be equal to fifty percent of the regular 30 program state cost per pupil for the same school budget year if 31 the pupilâs parent or guardian submitted an application under 32 subsection 3, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (2) . 33 Sec. 2. Section 257.11B, subsection 6, paragraph a, Code 34 2025, is amended to read as follows: 35 -1- LSB 1837YH (8) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 445 a. For each pupil approved for an education savings account 1 payment, the department of education or third-party entity 2 shall establish an individual account for that pupil in the 3 education savings account fund. The If the pupilâs parent 4 or guardian submitted an application under subsection 3, 5 paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (1), the amount of the pupilâs 6 education savings account payment shall be deposited into 7 the pupilâs individual account on July 15 or thirty days 8 following submission of the application, whichever is later, 9 and such amount shall be immediately available for the payment 10 of qualified educational expenses incurred by the parent or 11 guardian for the pupil during that fiscal year using a payment 12 method authorized under subsection 5 . If the pupilâs parent or 13 guardian submitted an application under subsection 3, paragraph 14 âaâ , subparagraph (2), the amount of the pupilâs education 15 savings account payment shall be deposited into the pupilâs 16 individual account within thirty days following submission of 17 the application, and such amount shall be immediately available 18 for the payment of qualified educational expenses incurred by 19 the parent or guardian for the pupil during that fiscal year 20 using a payment method authorized under subsection 5. 21